Washington statutes.
RCW 9.02.005

Transfer of duties to the department of health.

The powers and duties of the state board of health under this chapter shall be performed by the department of health.

[ 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 202; 1985 c 213 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1989 1st ex.s. c 9: See RCW 43.70.910 and 43.70.920.

Savings—Effective date—1985 c 213: See notes following RCW 43.20.050.